Utah statutes.
63G-6-102.   Purpose of chapter.

The underlying purposes and policies of this chapter are:

(1)  to simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing procurement by this state;

(2)  to ensure the fair and equitable treatment of all persons who deal with the procurement system of this state;

(3)  to provide increased economy in state procurement activities; and

(4)  to foster effective broad-based competition within the free enterprise system.

